ja: バックビームタイプ: 高さ調節式バックビーム; 位置調節式バックビーム; 固定式バックビーム; 回転式バックビーム; その他
th: ประเภทคานหลัง: คานหลังปรับความสูงได้; คานหลังปรับตำแหน่งได้; คานหลังแบบตายตัว; คานหลังแบบหมุน; อื่นๆ
ru: Тип задней перекладины: Задняя балка с регулируемой высотой; Задняя балка с регулируемым положением; Фиксированная задняя балка; Вращающаяся задняя балка; Другое
en: Back beam type: Adjustable height back beam; Adjustable position back beam; Fixed back beam; Rolling back beam; Other
bg-BG: Тип задна греда: Задна греда с регулируема височина; Задна греда с регулируема позиция; Фиксирана задна греда; Въртяща се задна греда; Друго
nl: Achterbalk type: In hoogte verstelbare achterboom; In positie verstelbare achterboom; Vaste achterboom; Draaiende achterboom; Overig
sl-SI: Vrsta zadnjega žarka: Zadnja prečka z nastavljivo višino; Zadnja prečka z nastavljivim položajem; Fiksna zadnja prečka; Vrtljiva zadnja prečka; Drugo
ko: 백빔 유형: 높이 조절식 백 빔; 위치 조절식 백 빔; 고정식 백 빔; 롤링 백 빔; 기타
pl: Typ tylnej belki: Tylny wał o regulowanej wysokości; Tylny wał o regulowanym położeniu; Stały wał tylny; Obrotowy wał tylny; Inne
fr: Type de support dorsal: Ensouple arrière à hauteur réglable; Ensouple arrière à position réglable; Ensouple arrière fixe; Ensouple arrière mobile; Autre
hr-HR: Vrsta osnovinog valjka: Stražnja greda prilagodljive visine; Stražnja greda prilagodljivog položaja; Fiksna stražnja greda; Rotirajuća stražnja greda; Ostalo
tr: Arka çözgü kirişi tipi: Yüksekliği ayarlanabilir arka kiriş; Konumu ayarlanabilir arka kiriş; Sabit arka kiriş; Tekerlekli arka kiriş; Diğer
cs: Typ zadního nosníku: Výškově nastavitelný zadní válec; Polohovatelně nastavitelný zadní válec; Pevný zadní válec; Pohyblivý zadní válec; Jiné
lt-LT: Galinės sijos tipas: Reguliuojamo aukščio galinė sija; Reguliuojamos padėties galinė sija; Fiksuota galinė sija; Besisukanti galinė sija; Kita
es: Tipo de viga trasera: Plegador trasero de altura ajustable; Plegador trasero de posición ajustable; Plegador trasero fijo; Plegador trasero giratorio; Otro
de: Rückstrahlertyp: Höhenverstellbarer Streichbaum; Positionsverstellbarer Streichbaum; Fester Streichbaum; Rollender Streichbaum; Sonstige
zh-TW: 後樑類型: 高度可調背樑; 位置可調背樑; 固定背樑; 滾動背樑; 其他
sv: Bakre brädtyp: Höjdjusterbar sträckbom; Positionsjusterbar sträckbom; Fast sträckbom; Rullande sträckbom; Övrigt
ro-RO: Tipul cadrului spate: Bară spate cu înălțime reglabilă; Bară spate cu poziție reglabilă; Bară spate fixă; Bară spate rotativă; Altele
pt-BR: Tipo de viga traseira: Viga traseira com altura ajustável; Viga traseira com posição ajustável; Viga traseira fixa; Viga traseira rolante; Outro
nb: Bakbjelketype: Bakbom med justerbar høyde; Bakbom med justerbar posisjon; Fast bakbom; Rullende bakbom; Annet
pt-PT: Tipo de viga traseira: Viga traseira de altura ajustável; Viga traseira de posição ajustável; Viga traseira fixa; Viga traseira rolante; Outro
el: Τύπος πίσω δοκού: Πίσω δοκός ρυθμιζόμενου ύψους; Πίσω δοκός ρυθμιζόμενης θέσης; Σταθερή πίσω δοκός; Κυλιόμενη πίσω δοκός; Άλλο
vi: Loại thanh đỡ phía sau: Thanh đỡ sau điều chỉnh độ cao; Thanh đỡ sau điều chỉnh vị trí; Thanh đỡ sau cố định; Thanh đỡ sau dạng cuộn; Khác
it: Tipo di trave posteriore: Subbio posteriore ad altezza regolabile; Subbio posteriore a posizione regolabile; Subbio posteriore fisso; Subbio posteriore rotante; Altro
sk-SK: Typ zadného nosníka: Výškovo nastaviteľný zadný nosník; Zadný nosník s nastaviteľnou polohou; Pevný zadný nosník; Otočný zadný nosník; Iný
fi: Takapalkin tyyppi: Korkeussäädettävä takapalkki; Sijainniltaan säädettävä takapalkki; Kiinteä takapalkki; Rullaava takapalkki; Muu
da: Bagbjælketype: Bagbom med justerbar højde; Bagbom med justerbar position; Fast bagbom; Rullende bagbom; Andet
hu: Hátsó gerenda típusa: Állítható magasságú hátsó henger; Állítható helyzetű hátsó henger; Fix hátsó henger; Görgős hátsó henger; Egyéb
zh-CN: 后横梁类型: 高度可调后梁; 位置可调后梁; 固定后梁; 滑动后梁; 其他